Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1915
Medical radiographer; authorized practice; requirements.

(1)(a) A person licensed by the department, with the recommendation of the board, as a medical radiographer may practice medical radiography on any part of the human anatomy for interpretation by, and under the direction of, a licensed practitioner, including computed tomography but excluding interpretative fluoroscopic procedures, and may use fluoroscopy in collaboration with a certified registered nurse anesthetist as authorized in section 38-711.

(b) A medical radiographer may also utilize fluoroscopy under the direction of, or in collaboration with, a nurse practitioner pursuant to section 38-2315.

(2) An applicant for a license as a medical radiographer shall:

(a) Complete an educational program in radiography approved by the board pursuant to subsection (1) of section 38-1918;

(b) Complete an application in accordance with the Uniform Credentialing Act; and

(c) Successfully complete an examination approved by the board.

(3) Presentation of proof of registration in radiography with the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists is proof of meeting the requirements of subdivisions (2)(a) and (c) of this section.

Laws 1987, LB 390, § 23;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 46;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 181;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 75;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 104;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3515.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 653;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 10;

Laws 2026, LB912, § 12.
July 18, 2026
Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.